Massachusetts, session 194th, H3714.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of chapter 90 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting
after the eighteenth paragraph, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, the following
paragraph:-
The registrar shall furnish without charge to owners of private passenger motor vehicles
who are veterans as defined in said clause Forty-third of said section seven of said chapter four
who have been awarded the Combat Infantryman Badge, Combat Infantryman Badge (Second
Award), or Combat Action Badge and upon evidence deemed satisfactory by the registrar,
distinctive registration plates bearing the words, "COMBAT VETERAN” and bearing a
distinctive emblem that identifies the branch of the armed services in which such owner served,
and the receipt of the Combat Infantryman Badge, Combat Infantryman Badge (Second Award),
or Combat Action Badge for one private passenger motor vehicle or motorcycle owned and
principally used by such recipient; provided, however, that the surviving spouse of a deceased
of 2

recipient may elect to retain such distinctive registration plates or emblem for personal use upon
payment of the established registration fee for private passenger motor vehicles or motorcycles
and an additional annual twenty dollar fee until such time as such spouse remarries or fails to
renew or cancels such registration.
of 2